testing/myv-tests.yaml
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокстонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокстонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкнконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкнконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкстонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкстонтькак
